New York, session 2025-2026, A7676.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 265.02 of the penal law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 4 to read as follows: 3 (4) Such person commits the crime of criminal possession of a weapon 4 in the fourth degree as defined in subdivision one, two or four of 5 section 265.01 of this article, when situated in a subway station, rail- 6 road station or terminal, or bus station or terminal, or on a subway 7 train, railroad train, or bus operated by a mass transit provider, 8 public or private, and such person uses or attempts to use such weapon 9 in the commission of another criminal act in such subway station, rail- 10 road station or terminal, or bus station or terminal, or on such subway 11 train, railroad train or bus; or 12 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of November next succeed- 13 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09348-01-5